Utah statutes.
57-25-101.   Title -- Scope.
(1)  This chapter is known as the "Uniform Environmental Covenants Act."
(2) (a)  This chapter applies to an environmental covenant created on or after
May 1, 2006.
(b)  Title 19, Chapter 10, Environmental Institutional Control Act, applies to
an environmental covenant created before May 1, 2006.
(3)  For the purposes of this chapter and Title 19, Chapter 10, Environmental
Institutional Control Act, an environmental institutional control, as defined
in Section 19-10-102, is considered an environmental covenant.
